Montana, session 2025, HB756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 22-3-1306, MCA, is amended to read:
"22-3-1306. Priorities for funding -- rulemaking. (1) The department of commerce shall make
recommendations for grants awarded under the historic preservation grant program to eligible entities for the
preservation of historic sites, historical societies, or history museums in the state.
(2) Projects funded under this section must provide that a significant portion of the facility be open
to public access and use. Projects that confer only a private a limited public benefit are not eligible.
(3) The recommendations must be based on competitive criteria created by the department, as
guided by the legislature. The criteria may include:
(a) the degree to which the project will protect:
(i) the building envelope, consisting of the structure's walls, roof, doors and windows, and
foundation; and
(ii) its internal utility systems, including electricity, plumbing, and heat;
(b) the degree of economic stimulus or economic activity, including job creation and work creation
for Montana contractors and service workers;
(b) (c) the purpose of the project, including whether it provides features that establish or enhance
security, climate control, or fire protection for museums or address infrastructure, maintenance, or building code
issues at historic sites;
(c) (d) the timing of the project, including access to matching funds, if needed, and approval of permits
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 756
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 756
so that work can be completed without delay;
(d) (e) the historic or heritage value related to the state of Montana;
(e) (f) the successful track record or experience of the organization directing the project;
(f) the expected ongoing economic benefit to the state as a result of the project completion;
(g) the degree of local contribution to the project;and
(h) (g) the anticipated public benefit, including the extent the site or building will be open to the public
and the degree of immediate facility use after project completion; and
(h) the degree of local contribution to the project. For-profit entities must provide a match equal to
$1 for every $1 of grant funding received.
(4) The department of commerce shall adopt rules necessary to implement the historic
preservation grant program. In adopting rules, the department shall look to the rules adopted for the Montana
coal endowment program, the cultural and aesthetic grant program, and other similar state programs. To the
extent feasible, the department shall make the rules compatible with those other programs.
(5) Government applicants shall comply with Article II, sections 8 and 9, of the Montana
constitution and with Title 2, chapter 3, parts 1 and 2, and Title 7. Nongovernment applicants are exempt from
this provision."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 756
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 756, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 756
INTRODUCED BY J. FITZPATRICK, M. VINTON, S. ROSENZWEIG, J. KASSMIER, E. BOLDMAN, J. ESP, P.
TUSS
AN ACT REVISING THE MONTANA MUSEUMS ACT OF 2020; REVISING THE CRITERIA USED TO MAKE
RECOMMENDATIONS FOR GRANTS AWARDED UNDER THE HISTORIC PRESERVATION GRANT
PROGRAM; AND AMENDING SECTION 22-3-1306, MCA.”